Hawaii statutes.
§454F-22 Mortgage loan originator, mortgage
loan originator company, exempt sponsoring mortgage loan originator company,
nonprofit organizations, and mortgage servicer company fees. (a) Except
as provided in subsection (b), a mortgage loan originator shall pay the
following fees to obtain and maintain a valid mortgage loan originator license:

(1) Initial application fee of $600;

(2) Annual license renewal fee of $350;

(3) Reinstatement fee of $100;

(4) Late fee of $25 per day; and

(5) Criminal background check fee of $35, or of an
amount determined by the commissioner by rule pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) A sole proprietorship mortgage loan
originator shall pay the following fees to obtain and maintain a valid sole
proprietor mortgage loan originator license:

(1) Initial application fee of $35;

(2) Annual license renewal fee of $35;

(3) Reinstatement fee of $100;

(4) Late fee of $25 per day; and

(5) Criminal background check fee of $35, or of an
amount determined by the commissioner by rule pursuant to chapter 91.

(c) A mortgage loan originator company shall
pay the following fees to maintain a valid mortgage loan originator company
license or branch license:

(1) Fees payable for a principal office of a mortgage
loan originator company:

(A) Initial application fee of $900;

(B) Processing fee of $35 for each control
person;

(C) Annual license renewal fee of $600;

(D) Reinstatement fee of $100;

(E) Late fee of $25 per day; and

(F) Criminal background check fee of $35, or
of an amount determined by the commissioner by rule pursuant to chapter 91, for
each control person, executive officer, director, general partner, and manager;
and

(2) Fees payable for each branch office of a mortgage
loan originator company:

(A) Initial application fee of $250;

(B) Annual license renewal fee of $100;

(C) Reinstatement fee of $100; and

(D) Late fee of $25 per day.

(d) An exempt sponsoring mortgage loan
originator company shall pay the following fees to maintain a valid
registration in NMLS:

(1) Initial registration fee of $200;

(2) Annual registration renewal fee of $150; and

(3) Late fee of $25 per day.

(e) A nonprofit organization shall pay the
following fees to maintain a valid registration as a nonprofit organization in
NMLS:

(1) Initial registration fee of $200;

(2) Annual registration renewal fee of $150; and

(3) Late fee of $25 per day.

(f) A mortgage servicer company shall pay for
a principal office the following fees to maintain a valid mortgage loan servicer
loan modification license:

(1) Initial application fee of $600;

(2) Annual license renewal fee of $600;

(3) Reinstatement fee of $100;

(4) Late fee of $25 per day; and

(5) Criminal background check fee of $35, or of an
amount determined by the commissioner by rule pursuant to chapter 91, for each
control person, executive officer, director, general partner, and managing
member.

(g) In addition to fees charged by NMLS, a
licensee shall pay to the commissioner a fee of $100 for each of the following
amendments to information provided to NMLS that require the review of the
commissioner:

(1) Change of physical location or mailing address
for branch office or principal place of business;

(2) Addition or deletion of a "d/b/a"
assignment;

(3) Change of mortgage loan originator's sponsor;

(4) Change of qualified individual;

(5) Change of branch manager; and

(6) Change of mortgage loan originator company's
legal name.

The commissioner, upon a showing of good cause, may
waive any fee set forth in this subsection.

(h) The fees established by this section are
nonrefundable and are in addition to any fees established and charged by NMLS,
an approved educational course provider, an approved educational testing
provider, a law enforcement agency for fingerprints and background checks, or a
credit reporting agency used by NMLS.

(i) The commissioner may establish, by
rule pursuant to chapter 91, any other fees or charges necessary for the
administration of this chapter. [L 2010, c 84, pt of §3; am L 2011, c 194, §13;
am L 2012, c 252, §10; am L 2013, c 168, §18; am L 2014, c 198, §9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next